Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 466 of Title 74, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Each member of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and each
member of the Oklahoma State Senate shall perform at least six (6)
days of substitute teaching during the school year in a public
school located, whether in whole or in part, within the member's
legislative district during any term of office to which the member
has been elected.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15781 MAH 01/06/26
Req. No. 15781 Page 1